common/src/resources/com/github/oeuvres/alix/fr/fr-alix.dic
circonscrire/y1
contredire/yD
décrire/y1
dédire/yD
désinscrire/y1
dire/yC
écrire/y1
élire/yB
ensuivre/xR
inscrire/y1
interdire/yD
lire/yA
médire/yE
prédire/yD
prescrire/y1
proscrire/y1
récrire/y1
redire/yC
réécrire/y1
réélire/yB
réinscrire/y1
relire/yA
retranscrire/y1
revivre/xSq+
souscrire/y1
survivre/xSq.
suscrire/y1
transcrire/y1
vivre/xSq+
